Indiana, session 2026, HB1344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 33-34-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 301, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The following fees and costs
apply to cases in the small claims court:
(1) A township docket fee of five dollars ($5) plus forty-five
percent (45%) of the infraction or ordinance violation costs fee
under IC 33-37-4-2.
(2) The bailiff's service of process by registered or certified mail
fee of fifteen dollars ($15) for each service.
(3) The cost for the personal service of process by the bailiff or
other process server of fifteen dollars ($15) for each service.
(4) Witness fees, if any, in the amount provided by IC 33-37-10-3
to be taxed and charged in the circuit court.
(5) A redocketing fee, if any, of five dollars ($5).
(6) A document storage fee under IC 33-37-5-20.
(7) An automated record keeping fee under IC 33-37-5-21.
(8) A late fee, if any, under IC 33-37-5-22.
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(9) A public defense administration fee under IC 33-37-5-21.2.
(10) A judicial insurance adjustment fee under IC 33-37-5-25.
(11) A judicial salaries fee under IC 33-37-5-26.
(12) A court administration fee under IC 33-37-5-27.
(13) A pro bono legal services fee under IC 33-37-5-31.
(14) A sheriff's service of process fee under IC 33-37-5-15 for
each service of process performed outside Marion County.
(15) A small claims service fee of twenty-six dollars ($26) under
IC 33-37-5-35.
(16) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee under
IC 33-37-5-37.
The township docket fee and the cost for the initial service of process
shall be paid at the institution of a case. The cost of service after the
initial service shall be assessed and paid after service has been made.
The cost of witness fees shall be paid before the witnesses are called.
(b) If the amount of the township docket fee computed under
subsection (a)(1) is not equal to a whole number, the amount shall be
rounded to the next highest whole number.
SECTION 2. IC 33-34-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 302, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Payment for all costs made as
a result of proceedings in a small claims court shall be to the _______
Township of Marion County Small Claims Court (with the name of the
township inserted). The court shall issue a receipt for all money
received on a form numbered serially in duplicate.
(b) The court shall distribute collected fees according the following:
(1) Distribute semiannually to the state comptroller:
(A) all automated record keeping fees (IC 33-37-5-21)
received by the court for deposit in the homeowner protection
unit account established by IC 4-6-12-9 and the state user fee
fund established under IC 33-37-9;
(B) all public defense administration fees collected by the
court under IC 33-37-5-21.2 for deposit in the state general
fund;
(C) sixty percent (60%) of all court administration fees
collected by the court under IC 33-37-5-27 for deposit in the
state general fund;
(D) all judicial insurance adjustment fees collected by the
court under IC 33-37-5-25 for deposit in the state general fund;
(E) seventy-five percent (75%) of all judicial salaries fees
collected by the court under IC 33-37-5-26 for deposit in the
state general fund; and
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(F) one hundred percent (100%) of the pro bono legal services
fees collected by the court under IC 33-37-5-31 for deposit in
the pro bono legal services fund established by IC 33-37-5-34;
and
(G) all prosecuting attorney compensation fees collected by
the court under IC 33-37-5-37 for deposit in the state
general fund.
(2) Distribute monthly to the county auditor all document storage
fees received by the court. The county auditor shall deposit the
document storage fees received under this subdivision into the
clerk's record perpetuation fund under IC 33-37-5-2.
(3) Distribute the following fees monthly to the county auditor for
deposit in the small claims fund established under IC 33-37-5-36:
(A) The remaining twenty-five percent (25%) of the judicial
salaries fees described in subdivision (1)(E).
(B) Township docket fees and late fees.
(C) Small claims service fee received under IC 33-37-5-35.
(D) The remaining forty percent (40%) of the court
administration fees described under subdivision (1)(C).
SECTION 3. IC 33-37-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.120-2023,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) For each action that results in a felony
conviction under IC 35-50-2 or a misdemeanor conviction under
IC 35-50-3, the clerk shall collect from the defendant a criminal costs
fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120).
(b) In addition to the criminal costs fee collected under this section,
the clerk shall collect from the defendant the following fees if they are
required under IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A marijuana eradication program fee (IC 33-37-5-7).
(3) An alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(4) A law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(5) A drug abuse, prosecution, interdiction, and correction fee
(IC 33-37-5-9).
(6) An alcohol and drug countermeasures fee (IC 33-37-5-10).
(7) A child abuse prevention fee (IC 33-37-5-12).
(8) A domestic violence prevention and treatment fee
(IC 33-37-5-13).
(9) A highway worksite fee (IC 33-37-5-14).
(10) A deferred prosecution fee (IC 33-37-5-17).
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(11) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(12) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(13) A late payment fee (IC 33-37-5-22).
(14) A sexual assault victims assistance fee (IC 33-37-5-23).
(15) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(16) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(17) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(18) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(19) A DNA sample processing fee (IC 33-37-5-26.2).
(20) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) Instead of the criminal costs fee prescribed by this section,
except for the automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21), the clerk
shall collect a pretrial diversion program fee if an agreement between
the prosecuting attorney and the accused person entered into under
IC 33-39-1-8 requires payment of those fees by the accused person.
The pretrial diversion program fee is:
(1) an initial user's fee of fifty dollars ($50) for a misdemeanor
offense;
(2) an initial user's fee of seventy-five dollars ($75) for a felony
offense;
(3) a monthly user's fee of twenty dollars ($20) for each month
that the person remains in the pretrial diversion program; and
(4) any additional program fee or cost that is:
(A) reasonably related to the person's rehabilitation; and
(B) approved by the court.
A monthly user fee may not be collected beyond the maximum length
of the possible sentence.
(d) The clerk shall transfer to the county auditor or city or town
fiscal officer the following fees, not later than thirty (30) days after the
fees are collected:
(1) The pretrial diversion fee.
(2) The marijuana eradication program fee.
(3) The alcohol and drug services program fee.
(4) The law enforcement continuing education program fee.
The auditor or fiscal officer shall deposit fees transferred under this
subsection in the appropriate user fee fund established under
IC 33-37-8.
(e) Unless otherwise directed by a court, if a clerk collects only part
of a criminal costs fee from a defendant under this section, the clerk
shall distribute the partial payment of the criminal costs fee as follows:
(1) The clerk shall apply the partial payment to general court
costs.
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(2) If there is money remaining after the partial payment is
applied to general court costs under subdivision (1), the clerk
shall distribute the remainder of the partial payment for deposit in
the appropriate county user fee fund.
(3) If there is money remaining after distribution under
subdivision (2), the clerk shall distribute the remainder of the
partial payment for deposit in the state user fee fund.
(4) If there is money remaining after distribution under
subdivision (3), the clerk shall distribute the remainder of the
partial payment to any other applicable user fee fund.
(5) If there is money remaining after distribution under
subdivision (4), the clerk shall apply the remainder of the partial
payment to any outstanding fines owed by the defendant.
SECTION 4. IC 33-37-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.120-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsections (d) and
(e), for each action that results in a judgment:
(1) for a violation constituting an infraction; or
(2) for a violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation (as
defined in IC 36-1-2-10);
the clerk shall collect from the defendant an infraction or ordinance
violation costs fee of seventy dollars ($70).
(b) In addition to the infraction or ordinance violation costs fee
collected under this section, the clerk shall collect from the defendant
the following fees, if they are required under IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) An alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(3) A law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(4) An alcohol and drug countermeasures fee (IC 33-37-5-10).
(5) A highway worksite fee (IC 33-37-5-14).
(6) A deferred prosecution fee (IC 33-37-5-17).
(7) A jury fee (IC 33-37-5-19).
(8) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(9) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(10) A late payment fee (IC 33-37-5-22).
(11) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(12) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(13) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(14) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(15) A DNA sample processing fee (IC 33-37-5-26.2).
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(16) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) The clerk shall transfer to the county auditor or fiscal officer of
the municipal corporation the following fees, not later than thirty (30)
days after the fees are collected:
(1) The alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(2) The law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(3) The deferral program fee (subsection (e)).
The auditor or fiscal officer shall deposit the fees in the user fee fund
established under IC 33-37-8.
(d) The defendant is not liable for any ordinance violation costs fee
in an action if all the following apply:
(1) The defendant was charged with an ordinance violation
subject to IC 33-36.
(2) The defendant denied the violation under IC 33-36-3.
(3) Proceedings in court against the defendant were initiated
under IC 34-28-5 (or IC 34-4-32 before its repeal).
(4) The defendant was tried and the court entered judgment for
the defendant for the violation.
(e) Instead of the infraction or ordinance violation costs fee
prescribed by subsection (a), except for the automated record keeping
fee (IC 33-37-5-21), the clerk shall collect a deferral program fee if an
agreement between a prosecuting attorney or an attorney for a
municipal corporation and the person charged with a violation entered
into under IC 34-28-5-1 (or IC 34-4-32-1 before its repeal) requires
payment of those fees by the person charged with the violation. The
deferral program fee is:
(1) an initial user's fee not to exceed fifty-two dollars ($52); and
(2) a monthly user's fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) for each
month the person remains in the deferral program.
(f) The fees prescribed by this section are costs for purposes of
IC 34-28-5-5 and may be collected from a defendant against whom
judgment is entered. Any penalty assessed is in addition to costs.
SECTION 5. IC 33-37-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2017,
SECTION 110, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The clerk shall collect a
juvenile costs fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each action
filed under any of the following:
(1) IC 31-34 (children in need of services).
(2) IC 31-37 (delinquent children).
(3) IC 31-14 (paternity).
(b) In addition to the juvenile costs fee collected under this section,
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


the clerk shall collect the following fees, if they are required under
IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A marijuana eradication program fee (IC 33-37-5-7).
(3) An alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(4) A law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(5) An alcohol and drug countermeasures fee (IC 33-37-5-10).
(6) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(7) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(8) A late payment fee (IC 33-37-5-22).
(9) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(10) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(11) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(12) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(13) A DNA sample processing fee (IC 33-37-5-26.2).
(14) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) The clerk shall transfer to the county auditor or city or town
fiscal officer the following fees not later than thirty (30) days after they
are collected:
(1) The marijuana eradication program fee (IC 33-37-5-7).
(2) The alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(3) The law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
The auditor or fiscal officer shall deposit the fees in the appropriate
user fee fund established under IC 33-37-8.
SECTION 6. IC 33-37-4-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The clerk shall collect a civil costs fee of
one hundred dollars ($100) from a party filing a civil action. This
subsection does not apply to the following civil actions:
(1) Proceedings to enforce a statute defining an infraction under
IC 34-28-5 (or IC 34-4-32 before its repeal).
(2) Proceedings to enforce an ordinance under IC 34-28-5 (or
IC 34-4-32 before its repeal).
(3) Proceedings in juvenile court under IC 31-34 or IC 31-37.
(4) Proceedings in paternity under IC 31-14.
(5) Proceedings in small claims court under IC 33-34.
(6) Proceedings in actions described in section 7 of this chapter.
(b) In addition to the civil costs fee collected under this section, the
clerk shall collect the following fees, if they are required under
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A support and maintenance fee (IC 33-37-5-6).
(3) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(4) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(5) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(6) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(7) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(8) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(9) A service fee (IC 33-37-5-28(b)(1) or IC 33-37-5-28(b)(2)).
(10) A garnishee service fee (IC 33-37-5-28(b)(3) or
IC 33-37-5-28(b)(4)).
(11) For a mortgage foreclosure action, a mortgage foreclosure
counseling and education fee (IC 33-37-5-33) (before its
expiration on July 1, 2017).
(12) A pro bono legal services fee (IC 33-37-5-31).
(13) A jury fee (IC 33-37-5-19.5).
(14) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
SECTION 7. IC 33-37-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) For each small claims action, the clerk shall
collect the following fees:
(1) From the party filing the action:
(A) a small claims costs fee of thirty-five dollars ($35);
(B) a small claims service fee of ten dollars ($10) for each
named defendant that is not a garnishee defendant; and
(C) if the party has named more than three (3) garnishees or
garnishee defendants, a small claims garnishee service fee of
ten dollars ($10) for each garnishee or garnishee defendant in
excess of three (3).
(2) From any party adding a defendant that is not a garnishee
defendant, a small claims service fee of ten dollars ($10) for each
defendant that is not a garnishee defendant added in the action.
(3) From any party adding a garnishee or garnishee defendant, a
small claims garnishee service fee of ten dollars ($10) for each
garnishee or garnishee defendant added to the action. However,
a clerk may not collect a small claims garnishee service fee for the
first three (3) garnishees named in the action.
However, a clerk may not collect a small claims costs fee, small claims
service fee, or small claims garnishee service fee for a small claims
action filed by or on behalf of the attorney general.
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(b) A clerk may not collect a fee under subsection (a)(1)(B),
(a)(1)(C), (a)(2), or (a)(3) for a small claims action filed through the
Indiana electronic filing system adopted by the Indiana supreme court.
(c) In addition to a small claims costs fee, small claims service fee,
and small claims garnishee service fee collected under this section, the
clerk shall collect the following fees, if they are required under
IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(3) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(4) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(5) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(6) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(7) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(8) A pro bono legal services fee (IC 33-37-5-31).
(9) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
SECTION 8. IC 33-37-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided under subsection (c), the
clerk shall collect from the party filing the action a probate costs fee of
one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each action filed under any of
the following:
(1) IC 29 (probate).
(2) IC 30 (trusts and fiduciaries).
(b) In addition to the probate costs fee collected under subsection
(a), the clerk shall collect from the party filing the action the following
fees, if they are required under IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(3) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(4) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(5) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(6) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(7) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(8) A pro bono legal services fee (IC 33-37-5-31).
(9) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) A clerk may not collect a court costs fee for the filing of the
following exempted actions:
(1) Petition to open a safety deposit box.
(2) Filing an inheritance tax return, unless proceedings other than
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


the court's approval of the return become necessary.
(3) Offering a will for probate under IC 29-1-7, unless
proceedings other than admitting the will to probate become
necessary.
(4) Filing a closing statement for an estate described in
IC 29-1-8-4.
SECTION 9. IC 33-37-5-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 37. (a) This section does not apply to a proceeding
involving a child alleged to be a delinquent child.
(b) This subsection does not apply to the following:
(1) A criminal proceeding.
(2) A proceeding to enforce a statute defining an infraction.
(3) A proceeding for an ordinance violation.
In each action filed in a court described in IC 33-37-1-1 and in each
small claims action in a court described in IC 33-34, the clerk shall
collect a prosecuting attorney compensation fee of ten dollars
($10).
(c) In each action in which a person is:
(1) convicted of an offense;
(2) required to pay a pretrial diversion fee; or
(3) required to pay a deferral fee;
the clerk shall collect a prosecuting attorney compensation fee of
fifty dollars ($50).
SECTION 10. IC 33-37-7-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute
semiannually to the state comptroller as the state share for deposit in
the homeowner protection unit account established by IC 4-6-12-9 one
hundred percent (100%) of the automated record keeping fees collected
under IC 33-37-5-21 with respect to actions resulting in the accused
person entering into a pretrial diversion program agreement under
IC 33-39-1-8 or a deferral program agreement under IC 34-28-5-1 and
for deposit in the state general fund seventy percent (70%) of the
amount of fees collected under the following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-3(a) (juvenile costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(6) IC 33-37-4-7(a) (probate costs fees).
(7) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


(b) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the state user fee fund established in
IC 33-37-9-2 the following:
(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
(3) One hundred percent (100%) of the child abuse prevention
fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(7).
(4) One hundred percent (100%) of the domestic violence
prevention and treatment fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(8).
(5) One hundred percent (100%) of the highway worksite fees
collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(9) and IC 33-37-4-2(b)(5).
(6) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18.
(7) One hundred percent (100%) of the automated record keeping
fee collected under IC 33-37-5-21 not distributed under
subsection (a).
(c) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor the following:
(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
The county auditor shall deposit fees distributed by a clerk under this
subsection into the county drug free community fund established under
IC 5-2-11.
(d) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor one hundred percent (100%) of the late payment fees collected
under IC 33-37-5-22. The county auditor shall deposit fees distributed
by a clerk under this subsection as follows:
(1) If directed to do so by an ordinance adopted by the county
fiscal body, the county auditor shall deposit forty percent (40%)
of the fees in the clerk's record perpetuation fund established
under IC 33-37-5-2 and sixty percent (60%) of the fees in the
county general fund.
(2) If the county fiscal body has not adopted an ordinance
described in subdivision (1), the county auditor shall deposit all
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


the fees in the county general fund.
(e) The clerk of the circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the sexual assault victims assistance
fund established by IC 5-2-6-23(d) one hundred percent (100%) of the
sexual assault victims assistance fees collected under IC 33-37-5-23.
(f) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor the following:
(1) One hundred percent (100%) of the support and maintenance
fees for cases designated as non-Title IV-D child support cases in
the Indiana support enforcement tracking system (ISETS) or the
successor statewide automated support enforcement system
collected under IC 33-37-5-6.
(2) The percentage share of the support and maintenance fees for
cases designated as Title IV-D child support cases in ISETS or the
successor statewide automated support enforcement system
collected under IC 33-37-5-6 that is reimbursable to the county at
the federal financial participation rate.
The county clerk shall distribute monthly to the department of child
services the percentage share of the support and maintenance fees for
cases designated as Title IV-D child support cases in ISETS, or the
successor statewide automated support enforcement system, collected
under IC 33-37-5-6 that is not reimbursable to the county at the
applicable federal financial participation rate.
(g) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor the following:
(1) One hundred percent (100%) of the small claims service fee
under IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(B) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(2) for deposit in
the county general fund.
(2) One hundred percent (100%) of the small claims garnishee
service fee under IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(C) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(3) for
deposit in the county general fund.
(3) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18 for deposit in the county general fund.
(h) This subsection does not apply to court administration fees
collected in small claims actions filed in a court described in IC 33-34.
The clerk of a circuit court shall semiannually distribute to the state
comptroller for deposit in the state general fund one hundred percent
(100%) of the following:
(1) The public defense administration fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-21.2.
(2) The judicial salaries fees collected under IC 33-37-5-26.
(3) The DNA sample processing fees collected under
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


IC 33-37-5-26.2.
(4) The court administration fees collected under IC 33-37-5-27.
(5) The judicial insurance adjustment fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-25.
(6) The prosecuting attorney compensation fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-37.
(i) The proceeds of the service fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-28(b)(1) or IC 33-37-5-28(b)(2) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
service fees collected in a circuit, superior, county, or probate
court to the county auditor for deposit in the county general fund.
(2) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
service fees collected in a city or town court to the city or town
fiscal officer for deposit in the city or town general fund.
(j) The proceeds of the garnishee service fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-28(b)(3) or IC 33-37-5-28(b)(4) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
garnishee service fees collected in a circuit, superior, county, or
probate court to the county auditor for deposit in the county
general fund.
(2) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
garnishee service fees collected in a city or town court to the city
or town fiscal officer for deposit in the city or town general fund.
(k) The clerk of the circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the home ownership education account
established by IC 5-20-1-27 one hundred percent (100%) of the
following:
(1) The mortgage foreclosure counseling and education fees
collected under IC 33-37-5-33 (before its expiration on July 1,
2017).
(2) Any civil penalties imposed and collected by a court for a
violation of a court order in a foreclosure action under
IC 32-30-10.5.
(l) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the pro bono legal services fund
established by IC 33-37-5-34 one hundred percent (100%) of the pro
bono legal services fees collected under IC 33-37-5-31.
SECTION 11. IC 33-37-7-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The clerk of a city or town court shall
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


distribute semiannually to the state comptroller as the state share for
deposit in the homeowner protection unit account established by
IC 4-6-12-9 one hundred percent (100%) of the automated record
keeping fees collected under IC 33-37-5-21 with respect to actions
resulting in the accused person entering into a pretrial diversion
program agreement under IC 33-39-1-8 or a deferral program
agreement under IC 34-28-5-1 and for deposit in the state general fund
fifty-five percent (55%) of the amount of fees collected under the
following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(b) The city or town fiscal officer shall distribute monthly to the
county auditor as the county share twenty percent (20%) of the amount
of fees collected under the following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(c) The city or town fiscal officer shall retain twenty-five percent
(25%) as the city or town share of the fees collected under the
following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(d) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute semiannually to
the state comptroller for deposit in the state user fee fund established
in IC 33-37-9 the following:
(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
(3) One hundred percent (100%) of the highway worksite fees
collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(9) and IC 33-37-4-2(b)(5).
(4) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the safe schools fee collected
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


under IC 33-37-5-18.
(5) One hundred percent (100%) of the automated record keeping
fee collected under IC 33-37-5-21 not distributed under
subsection (a).
(e) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute monthly to the
county auditor the following:
(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
The county auditor shall deposit fees distributed by a clerk under this
subsection into the county drug free community fund established under
IC 5-2-11.
(f) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute monthly to the
city or town fiscal officer (as defined in IC 36-1-2-7) one hundred
percent (100%) of the following:
(1) The late payment fees collected under IC 33-37-5-22.
(2) The small claims service fee collected under
IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(B) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(2).
(3) The small claims garnishee service fee collected under
IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(C) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(3).
(4) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18.
The city or town fiscal officer (as defined in IC 36-1-2-7) shall deposit
fees distributed by a clerk under this subsection in the city or town
general fund.
(g) The clerk of a city or town court shall semiannually distribute to
the state comptroller for deposit in the state general fund one hundred
percent (100%) of the following:
(1) The public defense administration fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-21.2.
(2) The DNA sample processing fees collected under
IC 33-37-5-26.2.
(3) The court administration fees collected under IC 33-37-5-27.
(4) The judicial insurance adjustment fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-25.
(5) The prosecuting attorney compensation fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-37.
(h) The clerk of a city or town court shall semiannually distribute to
the state comptroller for deposit in the state general fund seventy-five
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


percent (75%) of the judicial salaries fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-26. The city or town fiscal officer shall retain twenty-five
percent (25%) of the judicial salaries fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-26. The funds retained by the city or town shall be
prioritized to fund city or town court operations.
(i) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute semiannually to
the state comptroller for deposit in the pro bono legal services fund
established by IC 33-37-5-34 one hundred percent (100%) of the pro
bono legal services fees collected under IC 33-37-5-31.
SECTION 12. IC 33-39-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.55-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The council shall do the following:
(1) Assist in the coordination of the duties of the prosecuting
attorneys of the state and their staffs.
(2) Prepare manuals of procedure.
(3) Give assistance in preparation of the trial briefs, forms, and
instructions.
(4) Conduct training for prosecuting attorneys and the staff of
prosecuting attorneys.
(5) Conduct research and studies that would be of interest and
value to all prosecuting attorneys and their staffs.
(6) Maintain liaison contact with study commissions and agencies
of all branches of local, state, and federal government that will be
of benefit to law enforcement and the fair administration of
justice in Indiana.
(7) Adopt guidelines and standards for services under which
the counties will be eligible for reimbursement under
IC 33-39-11.
(7) (8) Adopt guidelines for the expenditure of funds derived from
a deferral program or a pretrial diversion program.
(8) (9) The council shall:
(A) compile forfeiture data received under IC 34-24-1-4.5; and
(B) annually submit a report to the legislative council
containing the compiled data.
The council shall submit the report to the legislative council before
July 15 of every year. The report must be in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6. The council may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this subdivision.
SECTION 13. IC 33-39-8.1-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.147-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) If the board determines that a prosecuting
attorney is a noncompliant prosecuting attorney, the board shall issue
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


a report to:
(1) the prosecuting attorneys council of Indiana; and
(2) the alleged noncompliant prosecuting attorney.
(b) Upon receipt of a report that a prosecuting attorney is a
noncompliant prosecuting attorney, the board may notify the state
comptroller.
SECTION 14. IC 33-39-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Public Prosecution Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "council" means the prosecuting
attorneys council of Indiana established by IC 33-39-8-2.
Sec. 2. The public prosecution fund is established to provide
county reimbursement of compensation paid to deputy prosecuting
attorneys and administrative expenses. The fund shall be
administered by the council.
Sec. 3. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund by
the general assembly.
Sec. 4. The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund
not currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
Sec. 5. Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 6. (a) A county auditor may submit on a quarterly basis a
certified request to the state comptroller for reimbursement from
the public prosecution fund for salary paid to a deputy prosecuting
attorney, other than a chief deputy prosecuting attorney or an
elected prosecuting attorney, if the annual salary of the deputy
prosecuting attorney is equal to at least fifty-five percent (55%) of
the salary paid to the elected full-time prosecuting attorney. The
county auditor may request reimbursement under this subsection
in an amount that does not exceed twenty-seven and one-half
percent (27.5%) of the salary paid to the elected full-time
prosecuting attorney.
(b) A county auditor may submit on a quarterly basis a certified
request to the state comptroller for reimbursement from the public
prosecution fund for the county's expenditures for fringe benefits
provided to a deputy prosecuting attorney, other than a chief
deputy prosecuting attorney or an elected prosecuting attorney, if
the annual salary of the deputy prosecuting attorney is equal to at
least fifty-five percent (55%) of the salary paid to the elected
full-time prosecuting attorney. However, a request for
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


reimbursement for fringe benefits under this subsection may not
exceed fifteen thousand one hundred forty dollars ($15,140).
Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), upon receiving
certification from a county auditor, the state comptroller shall
issue a warrant to the treasurer of state for disbursement to the
county of the amount certified.
(b) If the state comptroller has received instruction from the
council under IC 33-39-8.1-9 to withhold payment from the county
because the prosecuting attorney is a noncompliant prosecuting
attorney, the state comptroller shall not issue a warrant under
subsection (a).
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Judiciary, to which was referred
House Bill 1344, has had the same under consideration and begs leave
to report the same back to the House with the recommendation that said
bill be amended as follows:
Page 10, line 17, delete "forty" and insert "ten".
Page 10, line 18, delete "($40)." and insert "($10).".
Page 10, line 21, after "fee;" insert "or".
Page 10, line 22, delete "found to have committed an infraction; or"
and insert "required to pay a deferral fee;".
Page 10, delete line 23.
Page 10, line 24, after "of" insert "fifty dollars ($50).".
Page 10, delete line 25.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1344 as introduced.)
JETER
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
HB 1344—LS 6815/DI 151